Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,162
Merger of districts; election; effect.

If at such election a majority of all votes cast at the election in each district are not in favor of such merger, the merger plan shall be defeated and shall not be placed in effect. If at such election a majority of all votes cast at the election in each district shall be in favor of such merger, the merger shall be effective immediately and the merged district shall assume all rights, assets and liabilities of the merged districts.

Laws 1972, LB 1509, § 10.